apertium-jdt.jdt.twoc
Alphabet
  %[%-neg%]:0
  %[%+neg%]:0
  %[%-nen%]:0
  %[%+nen%]:0
  %[%-loc%]:0
  %[%+loc%]:0
;

Rules

"Remove paths without matching suffix feature - verb negative"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ :* Fy:0 ;
   where Fx in ( %[%-neg%] )
         Fy in ( %[%+neg%] )
   matched ;

"Remove paths without matching prefix feature - verb negative"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Fy:0 :* _ ;
   where Fy in ( %[%-neg%] )
         Fx in ( %[%+neg%] )
matched ; 

"Remove paths without matching suffix feature - noun negative"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ :* Fy:0 ;
   where Fx in ( %[%-nen%] )
         Fy in ( %[%+nen%] )
   matched ;

"Remove paths without matching prefix feature - noun negative"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Fy:0 :* _ ;
   where Fy in ( %[%-nen%] )
         Fx in ( %[%+nen%] )
matched ; 

"Remove paths without matching suffix feature - locative"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ :* Fy:0 ;
   where Fx in ( %[%-loc%] )
         Fy in ( %[%+loc%] )
   matched ;

"Remove paths without matching prefix feature - locative"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Fy:0 :* _ ;
   where Fy in ( %[%-loc%] )
         Fx in ( %[%+loc%] )
matched ; 
